morph-phon.xfst
!
! DelS
!
! Delete (s) after a few marked nouns. The well known example is cami
! -> cami-i (p3s or compn). Yet, this deletion in current language
! seems to be optional ((as of 2009-10-21 google finds
! more `camisi' than `camii'). Better course of action seems to be
! disregarding this alternation during generation.
!

define DelS %^%(s%) (->) 0 || %@DELS%@ IntSym* _ 
    .o. %@DELS%@ -> 0;

!
! InsertS
!
! for now this handles only a single exception with the root 'güvey'.
!

define InsertS [..] (->) s || .#. (i ç) g ü v e y IntSym* _ %^%(s%) %^I;

!
! Pronoun Exceptions
!
!
! The stuff below in the order composed:
!   . before dative marker `ben' and `sen' become `ban-a' and `san-a'
!   . o/bu/şu before plural and case markers an `n' is inserted
!   . o/bu/şu before 1st/2nd person possessive suffixes a `y' is inserted
!   . after listed pronouns, before (y)lA, surface form of the genitive 
!     suffix  is inserted (this is about form, it is not the genitive marker)
!     this is normally the rule, a large number of speaker do not follow it.
!     again, it may be a good idea to restrict generation on this one.
!   . genitive marker after ben/biz becomes -Im instead of -(n)In.
!   . locative pronouns ora/bura/sura/nere optionally loose their 
!     last vowel if they precede -DA and -DAn, and less frequently -(y)A. 
!     this is another case where generations should take only one of
!     the options (not deleting the vowel is the correct written form, in
!     colloquial use deletion is more common for -DA and -DAn)
!     A similar contraction also occurs for "directional pronouns"
!     içeri and dışarı before -dA and -dAN (e.g., içerden, dışarda).
!     

define PronounExceptions  e -> a || .#. [b|s] _ n %@PRN %@RB %^%(y%) %^A %@MB 
                      .o. [..] -> n || .#. [ {o}  |
                                             {bu} |
                                             {şu} |
                                             {kendi} |
                                             {kendisi} |
                                             {biri} |
                                             {birisi} |
                                             {birileri} |
                                             {üzeri} |
                                             {kendileri}
                                           ] %@RB (AposSym) Boundary*
                                       _
                                           [ %^%(y%) %^I        |
                                             %^%(y%) %^A        |
                                             %^D %^A n          |
                                             %^C %^A            |
                                             %^D %^A 
                                           ] %@MB
                      .o. [..] -> n || .#. [ {o}  |
                                             {bu} |
                                             {şu} ] %@RB (AposSym) Boundary*
                                       _
                                           [ l %^A (r)          |
                                             %^%(y%) l %^A      |
                                             s %^I z
                                           ] %@MB
                      .o. [..] (->) n || .#. [ {kendi} |
                                             {kendisi} |
                                             {kendileri}
                                           ] %@RB (AposSym) Boundary*
                                       _
                                             %^%(y%) l %^A %@MB
                      .o. [..] -> y || .#. [ {o}  |
                                             {bu} |
                                             {şu}
                                           ] 
                                       _ %@RB (AposSym) Boundary*
                                           [ %^%(I%) m       |
                                             %^%(I%) n       |
                                             %^%(I%) m %^I z |
                                             %^%(I%) n %^I z 
                                           ] %@MB
                      .o. [..] (->) %^%(n%) %^I n || .#. [ [{ben} | 
                                                            {sen} | 
                                                            {biz} ] %@PRN |
                                                           {o}   | 
                                                           {siz} | 
                                                           {bu}  | 
                                                           {şu}  |
                                                           {kim}
                                                         ] %@RB (AposSym) Boundary* (n) _
                                                        %^%(y%) l %^A %@MB
                      .o. n -> m 
                        || .#. [{ben}|{biz}] %@PRN Boundary+ %^%(n%) %^I _  
                      .o. %@PRN -> 0
                      .o. [a|e] (->) 0 || .#. [{bur}|{şur}|{or}|{ner}] _
                                        %@RB [%^D %^A (n) | %^%(y%) %^A] %@MB 
                      .o. %^%(y%) -> y || .#. [{bur}|{şur}|{or}|{ner}] %@RB _ %^A %@MB
                      .o. [i|ı] (->) 0 || .#. [{içer}|{dışar}] _
                                        Boundary+ [%^D %^A (n) ] %@MB  ;
!
! InsertY
!
!
! The symbol `y'  is inserted after some words, particularly 
! ones that end with `su' and before the suffixes that start with 
! (n), (y) or (I) (genitive and possessive suffixes except p3p).
! For some words, this insertion seems to be optional for some 
! speakers/registers, e.g., `ne-y-imiz' is the common/correct form but 
! `ne-miz' is also used relatively frequently.


define insertYwords     {su}|{özsu}|{karasu} ;
define insertYoptional  {ne}|{akarsu}|{Akarsu} ;

define InsertY  [..] -> y 
                || .#. insertYwords %@RB _ [%^%(I%) | %^%(n%) | %^%(s%)]
            .o. [..] (->) y 
                || .#. insertYoptional %@RB _ [ %^%(I%) | %^%(n%) | %^%(s%)] ;


!
! Delete buffer y after i-
!

define iDeleteY %^%(y%) -> 0 || .#. i %@RB _ ;

!
! `N' before  passive morpheme
!
!
! after a limited set of verbal roots, and optional `n' is inserted
! before passive morpheme

define wordsPassiveN {de}|{ye}|{yaşa}|{kapa}|{boya}|{söyle}|{iste};
define NbeforePassive [..] (->) n ||  .#. wordsPassiveN %@RB 
                                     _ %^%(I%) %@LN %@MB ;

!
! Replace intermediate symbol @LN on passive according to preceding context
!
!
! The passive morpheme is -(I)n if the preceding letter is `l' or a 
! vowel -(I)n otherwise. We also add a few more exceptional cases here.
! Namely,
!       - in the passive form of the verb stems ending with `koy'
!          `y' becomes `n' optionally (generally preferred). 
!       - the passive form of `kapa' is `kapatıl'. Note that with the
!         above exception, this makes it ambiguous between 'kapatıl' 
!         and `kapanıl'. 
!           TODO: not completely convinced that `kapanır' is not another 
!                 option
!       - the passive form of `anla' is `anlaşıl'
!
! TODO: LN2 repetition is ugly, it could be done nicer.
!

define PassiveLN  y (->) n  || k o _ %@RB  %^%(I%) %@LN %@MB
              .o. %^%(I%) %@LN (->) 0 || k o n %@RB  _ %@MB
              .o. [..] -> t || .#. {kapa} %@RB _ %^%(I%) %@LN %@MB
              .o. [..] -> ş || .#. {anla} %@RB _ %^%(I%) %@LN %@MB
              .o. %@LN -> n || [Vall | l] IntSym* %^%(I%) _ %@MB
              .o. %@LN -> l 
              .o. %@LN2 -> n || [Vall | l] IntSym* %^%(I%) _ %@MB
              .o. %@LN2 -> l
              ;

!
! Replace intermediate symbol @CAUS with the correct form of causative suffix
!
!
! Except in lexical exceptions handled in morphotactics, the passive suffix 
! is -t after a `l', `r' or vowel, otherwise it is -DIr.

define Causative  %@CAUS -> t          // [Vall | l | r] IntSym*  _ %@MB 
              ,,  %@CAUS -> %^D %^I r  // \[Vall | l | r] Boundary+  _ %@MB;

!
! Optative 3s form change
!
!
! After third person agreement suffixes optative suffix disappears. We mark
! this with symbol @opt3 in morphotactics, so that it is easy to spot it
! here.
!

define Optative3  %^%(y%) %^A -> 0 || Boundary _ %@MB %@opt3
              .o. %@opt3 -> 0;

!
! Insert space before question particle
!
!
! Even though it is normally written separately, correct analysis of the 
! question particle -mI requires the knowledge of the previous word 
! (generally verb). The following allows correct analysis in such
! cases given that the input is tokenized accordingly (keeping the
! preceding verbal form and the question particle within the same
! token). 
!
! Furthermore, people tend not to obey the rules, and do not leave
! space between the question particle and the preceding word. As a
! making this insertion optional allows us to analyze less formal
! writing like blog posts or internet forums.

#if (MI_NOSPACE == 1)
define SpaceBeforeMI    %@miSPC -> [0|" "];
#else
define SpaceBeforeMI    %@miSPC -> " ";
#endif

!
! Negative Aorist
!
!
! Aorist suffix becomes -z after negative marker -mA, and before first
! person suffixes it gets dropped completely.
!

define NegAorist  %^%(I%) r -> z || Boundary m (%^NNS) %^A %@MB  
                                   _ %@MB
            .o. z -> 0 || Boundary m (%^NNS) %^A %@MB 
                         _ %@MB %^%(y%) %^I [m | z] %@MB
            .o. %^%(y%) %^I -> 0 || Boundary m (%^NNS) %^A %@MB %@MB
                                   _ m %@MB;

!
! Insertion of a redundant negative marker -mA in 'duyMAmazlıktan', 
! 'görMEmezlikten', etc. This happens only with a few verb roots, 
! but we allow for all here. The suffix sequence is also rather 
! specific, and does not occur (much) in other contexts.
!
! This is non-standard.
!

define DoubleNegative [..] (->) %@MB m %^A || Boundary m (%^NNS) %^A _ 
                                              %@MB z [%@MB]+
                                              ( l %^I %^k ) [%@MB]*
                                              %^D %^A n ;

!
! Buffer deletion
!

define NonBufCons [Cons | ConsXX ];
define DelBufCons [ConsBuf -> 0 || [Cons | ConsXX] [IntSym | AposSym]* _ ]
                  .o. [ %^%(y%) -> y,, 
                        %^%(s%) -> s,,
                        %^%(ş%) -> ş,,
                        %^%(n%) -> n 
                      ];

define DelBufVow [Vbuf -> 0 || [Vowel | Vxx ] [IntSym | AposSym]* _ ] 
             .o. [ %^%(I%) -> %^I ,,
                   %^%(A%) -> %^A ] ;

define DeleteBuffer DelBufCons .o. DelBufVow ;

!
! de/ye exception
!
!
! final `e' becomes `i' in `de' and `ye' before a suffix starting
! with  `y'.
! Second line addes an exception to the exception optionally allowing 'deyiş'.
!

define DeYeException e -> i || .#. [d|y] _ %@RB Boundary* y 
                .o. i (->) e || .#. d _ %@RB Boundary* y %^I ş ;

!
! -yor exception
!
!
! `a' `e' and underspecified low-unrounded vowel `A' becomes
! corresponding high vowel before the suffix -yor
!
! We change all to ^I here and let the vowel harmony do the rest.

define YorException [a|e|%^A] -> %^I || _ Boundary (%^I) y IntSym* o r %@MB;

!
! Question particle mI
!
!
! We analyze question particle mI as a free morpheme. It normally follows
! vowel harmony according to the preceding word. But we allow all
! combinations here. This option overgenerates.
!
!define CliticMI %^I -> [ı|i|u|ü] || .#. m _ %@RB;

!
! vowel epenthesis: burun -> burnu
!
!
! Delete vowels after @DEL@ from lexically marked words 
! if they are suffixed a morpheme starting with a vowel.
!

define VowelEpenthesis [ Vowel -> 0 ||  _ %@DEL%@ ConsAll IntSym* Vall ]
                   .o. %@DEL%@ -> 0;


!
! Vowel Harmony
!
! We also delete `palatalized' vowels at the end since they are
! only used for vowel harmony.
!
